Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-607
Alley, defined.

Alley shall mean a highway intended to provide access to the rear or side of lots or buildings and not intended for the purpose of through vehicular traffic.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 103.